Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 7. Transferable Interests and Rights of Transferees and Creditors.

§79-14-701.
Nature of transferable interest.

A transferable interest is personal property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-701 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 701;
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 46, effective from and after January 1, 2015; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the nature of a partnership interest. Present similar provisions are found in current
§ 79-14-701, above.

§79-14-702.
Transfer of transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause a partner’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities and affairs; and

Subject to Section 79-14-704, does not entitle the transferee to:

Participate in the management or conduct of the partnership’s activities and affairs; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), have access to required information, records, or other information concerning the partnership’s activities and affairs.

A transferee has the right to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled.

In a dissolution and winding up of a limited partnership, a transferee is entitled to an account of the partnership’s transactions only from the date of dissolution.

A transferable interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest issued by a limited partnership in a record, and, subject to this section, the interest represented by the certificate may be transferred by a transfer of the certificate.

A limited partnership need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until the partnership knows or has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective if the intended transferee has knowledge or notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 79-14-601(b)(4)(B) and 79-14-603(4)(B), if a general or limited partner transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a general or limited partner other than the transferable interest transferred and retains all the duties and obligations of a general or limited partner.

If a general or limited partner transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a general or limited partner with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the transferor’s obligations under Sections 79-14-502 and 79-14-505 known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a partner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-702 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 702, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to assignments of partnership interests. Present provisions relating to the transfer of a transferable interest are found in current
§ 79-14-702, above.

Provision that person ceases to be general partner when he ceases to be member of limited partnership pursuant to this section, see § 79-14-402.

Sale, assignment or other disposition or other dispositon of any interest in limited partnership that holds state gaming license, see § 75-76-223.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 819, 820 et seq.

§79-14-703.
Charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or transferee, a court may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. A charging order constitutes a lien on a judgment debtor’s transferable interest and requires the limited partnership to pay over to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that otherwise would be paid to the judgment debtor.

To the extent necessary to effectuate the collection of distributions pursuant to a charging order in effect under subsection (a), the court may:

Appoint a receiver of the distributions subject to the charging order, with the power to make all inquiries the judgment debtor might have made; and

Make all other orders necessary to give effect to the charging order.

Upon a showing that distributions under a charging order will not pay the judgment debt within a reasonable time, the court may foreclose the lien and order the sale of the transferable interest. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale obtains only the transferable interest, does not thereby become a partner, and is subject to Section 79-14-702.

At any time before foreclosure under subsection (c), the partner or transferee whose transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subsection (a) may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

At any time before foreclosure under subsection (c), a limited partnership or one or more partners whose transferable interests are not subject to the charging order may pay to the judgment creditor the full amount due under the judgment and thereby succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging order.

This chapter does not deprive any partner or transferee of the benefit of any exemption law applicable to the transferable interest of the partner or transferee.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking, in the capacity of a judgment creditor, to enforce a judgment against a partner or transferee may satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor’s transferable interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former § 79-14-703 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 703, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the rights of a creditor of a partner. For present provisions relating to actions by and against partnerships and partners, see § 79-14-405.

The trial court properly revoked its order directing the sale of a debtor’s 47 percent interest in partnerships, where individuals received a 99.7 percent interest in the partnerships before a writ of fieri facias was served on the debtor, which transfer of ownership effectively cut off a creditor bank’s ability to reach the 47 percent interest in the partnership previously owned by the debtor. Grenada Bank v. Willey, 694 F.2d 85, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23152 (5th Cir. Miss. 1982).

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 601.

§79-14-704.
Power to legal representative of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner’s legal representative may exercise:

The rights of a transferee provided in Section 79-14-702(c); and

For the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current limited partner under Section 79-14-304.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-704 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 704, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the right of an assignee to become a limited partner.

Admission of assignee of partnership interest as additional limited partner, see § 79-14-301.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

§79-14-705.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-705 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 705, effective from and after January 1, 1988]

Former
§ 79-14-705 related to the power of the estate of a deceased or incompetent partner. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-704.

§79-14-706.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

§79-14-706 [Laws, 2010, ch. 506, § 42, effective from and after July 1, 2010]

Former
§ 79-14-706 related to the enforceability of limitations on assignments of limited partnership interests.